District of Columbia statutes.
16-3502

Parties who may institute; ex rel. proceedings.

The Attorney General of the United States or the United States attorney may institute a proceeding pursuant to this subchapter on his own motion or on the relation of a third person. The writ may not be issued on the relation of a third person except by leave of the court, to be applied for by the relator, by a petition duly verified setting forth the grounds of the application, or until the relator files a bond with sufficient surety, to be approved by the clerk of the court, in such penalty as the court prescribes, conditioned on the payment by him of all costs incurred in the prosecution of the writ if costs are not recovered from and paid by the defendant.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 602, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 562, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(n)

Section References

This section is referenced in § 16-3503.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-3502.
1973 Ed., § 16-3502.